Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 3
FEES AND CASH FUNDS

42-3-301. License plate cash fund - license plate fees.

In addition to the payment of any fees for motor vehicle registration or for the issuance of license plates, decals, or validating tabs, each owner of a motor vehicle issued a license plate, decal, or validating tab for a motor vehicle pursuant to this article shall also pay a fee to cover the direct costs of such plates, decals, or tabs. The amount of the fee imposed pursuant to this section shall be as specified in paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section.

Fees collected pursuant to this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the license plate cash fund, which fund is hereby created. The fund shall be administered by the state treasurer. Moneys in the fund shall be appropriated by the general assembly for the direct costs incurred by the department in purchasing, as provided in section 17-24-109.5 (2), C.R.S., license plates, decals, and validating tabs from the division of correctional industries, referred to in this section as the "division", in the department of corrections, and issuing license plates pursuant to this article. At the end of each fiscal year, any unexpended and unencumbered moneys in the fund remain in the fund.

The fees imposed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be limited to the amount necessary to recover the costs of the production and distribution of any license plates, decals, or validating tabs issued pursuant to this article 3 and the related support functions provided to the department of revenue by the division. The correctional industries advisory committee, established pursuant to section 17-24-104 (2), shall annually review and recommend to the director of the division the amounts of the fees to be imposed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The director of the division, in cooperation and consultation with the department of revenue and the office of state planning and budgeting, shall annually establish the amounts of the fees imposed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section to recover the division's costs pursuant to this subsection (2).

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, with the exception of special license plates issued pursuant to section 42-3-213 for purple heart recipients, medal of valor recipients, former prisoners of war, survivors of the attack on Pearl Harbor, disabled veterans, or recipients of a medal of honor, the fees imposed by this subsection (2) shall apply to all other special license plates issued in accordance with this article.

The department may seek and accept gifts, grants, or donations from private or public sources for the purposes of this section; except that the department may not accept a gift, grant, or donation that is subject to conditions that are inconsistent with this section or any other law of the state.

Source:

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 143, § 9, effective April 5; entire article amended with relocations, p. 1134, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

(2)(a)(II) amended, p. 2038, § 2, effective August 7; (2)(a)(II) amended, p. 1485, § 2, effective August 7; (2)(a)(II) amended, p. 1068, § 2, effective August 7; (2)(b) amended, p. 921, § 3, effective January 1, 2007; (2)(a)(II) amended, p. 1623, § 2, effective July 1, 2007.

L. 2007:

(2)(a)(II) amended, p. 968, § 2, effective August 3; (2)(a)(II) amended, p. 2076, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2008:

(2)(a)(II) amended, p. 2272, § 3, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2009:

(1)(b) and (2)(a) amended, (HB 09-1133), ch. 307, p. 1654, § 1, effective August 5; (2)(a)(VIII) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1267, § 28, effective October 1.

L. 2014:

(1)(b) amended, (SB 14-194), ch. 346, p. 1551, § 18, effective June 5.

L. 2015:

(2)(c) added, (SB 15-090), ch. 334, p. 1360, § 3, see subsection (6) of the editor's note following this section.

L. 2017:

(2)(a) amended, (SB 17-031), ch. 92, p. 282, § 11, effective August 9.

42-3-302. Special plate fees.

The fees collected pursuant to sections 42-3-213 and 42-3-217 for the issuance of a license plate pursuant to sections 42-3-213 (9) and 42-3-217 shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the license plate cash fund created in section 42-3-301.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1135, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2017:

(2) repealed, (HB 17-1137), ch. 45, p. 136, § 8, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-3-122.5 as it existed prior to 2005.

42-3-303. Persistent drunk driver cash fund - programs to deter persistent drunk drivers.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the persistent drunk driver cash fund, which shall be composed of moneys collected for penalty surcharges under section 42-4-1307 (10)(b). The moneys in the fund are subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly:

To pay the costs incurred by the department concerning persistent drunk drivers under sections 42-2-126 (10) and 42-7-406 (1.5);

To pay for costs incurred by the department for computer programing changes related to treatment compliance for persistent drunk drivers pursuant to section 42-2-144;

To support programs that are intended to deter persistent drunk driving or intended to educate the public, with particular emphasis on the education of young drivers, regarding the dangers of persistent drunk driving.

The departments of transportation, revenue, and human services and the judicial branch shall coordinate programs intended to accomplish the goals described in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c).

On and after July 1, 2007, to pay a portion of the costs for intervention or treatment services required under sections 42-2-125, 42-2-126, 42-2-132, 42-2-132.5, and 42-4-1301.3 for a persistent drunk driver, as defined in section 42-1-102 (68.5), who is unable to pay for the required intervention or treatment services;

To assist in providing court-ordered alcohol treatment programs for indigent and incarcerated offenders;

To assist in providing approved ignition interlock devices, as defined in section 42-2-132.5 (9)(a), for indigent offenders; and

To assist in providing continuous monitoring technology or devices for indigent offenders.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1135, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1369, § 8, effective January 1, 2007.

L. 2008:

(1)(a) amended, p. 252, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1)(c)(II) amended and (1)(e), (1)(f), and (1)(g) added, (HB 10-1347), ch. 258, p. 1158, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

IP(1) amended, (HB 11-1268), ch. 267, p. 1221, § 5, effective June 2; IP(1) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1182, § 109, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

IP(1) and (1)(f) amended, (HB 12-1168), ch. 278, p. 1484, § 7, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-3-130.5 as it existed prior to 2005.

42-3-304. Registration fees - passenger and passenger-mile taxes - clean screen fund - definitions.

In addition to other fees specified in this section, an applicant shall pay a motorist insurance identification fee in an amount determined by paragraph (d) of subsection (18) of this section when applying for registration or renewal of registration of a motor vehicle under this article.

The following vehicles are exempt from the motorist insurance identification fee:

Vehicles that are exempt from registration fees under this section or are owned by persons who have qualified as self-insured pursuant to section 10-4-624, C.R.S.

Repealed.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-274), ch. 210, p. 955, § 8, effective May 1, 2009.)

With respect to passenger-carrying motor vehicles, the weight used in computing annual registration fees shall be that weight published by the manufacturer in approved manuals, and, in case of a dispute over the weight of such vehicle, the actual weight determined by weighing such vehicle on a certified scale, as provided in section 35-14-122 (6), C.R.S., shall be conclusive. With respect to all other vehicles, the weight used in computing annual registration fees shall be the empty weight, determined by weighing such vehicle on a certified scale or in the case of registration fees imposed pursuant to section 42-3-306 (5), the declared gross vehicle weight of the vehicle declared by the owner at the time of registration.

No fee shall be payable for the annual registration of a vehicle when:

The owner of such vehicle is a veteran who in an application for registration shows that the owner has established such owner's rights to benefits under the provisions of Public Law 663, 79th Congress, as amended, and Public Law 187, 82nd Congress, as amended, or is a veteran of the armed forces of the United States who incurred a disability and who is, at the date of such application, receiving compensation from the veterans administration or any branch of the armed forces of the United States for a fifty percent or more, service-connected, permanent disability, or for loss of use of one or both feet or one or both hands, or for permanent impairment or loss of vision in both eyes that constitutes virtual or actual blindness. The exemption provided in this paragraph (a) shall apply to the original qualifying vehicle and to any vehicle subsequently purchased and owned by the same veteran but shall not apply to more than one vehicle at a time.

The application for registration shows that the owner of such vehicle is a foreign government or a consul or other official representative of a foreign government duly recognized by the department of state of the United States government. License plates for the vehicles qualifying for the exemption granted in this paragraph (b) shall be issued only by the department and shall bear such inscription as may be required to indicate their status.

The owner of such vehicle is the state or a political or governmental subdivision thereof; but any such vehicle that is leased, either by the state or any political or governmental subdivision thereof, shall be exempt from payment of an annual registration fee only if the agreement under which it is leased has been first submitted to the department and approved, and such vehicle shall remain exempt from payment of an annual registration fee only so long as it is used and operated in strict conformity with such approved agreement.

The owner of such vehicle is a former prisoner of war being issued special plates pursuant to section 42-3-213 (3) or is the surviving spouse of a former prisoner of war retaining the special plates that were issued to such former prisoner of war pursuant to section 42-3-213 (3).

The owner of such vehicle is the recipient of a purple heart being issued special plates pursuant to section 42-3-213 (2).

The owner of such vehicle is a recipient of a medal of honor issued special plates pursuant to section 42-3-213 (7).

The owner of the vehicle is a recipient of a medal of valor and is issued special license plates pursuant to section 42-3-213 (10).

The owner of the vehicle survived the attack on Pearl Harbor and is issued special license plates pursuant to section 42-3-213 (6).

Upon registration, the owner of each motorcycle shall pay a surcharge of four dollars, which shall be credited to the motorcycle operator safety training fund created in section 43-5-504, C.R.S.

In lieu of registering each vehicle separately, a dealer in motorcycles shall pay to the department an annual registration fee of twenty-five dollars for the first license plate issued pursuant to section 42-3-116 (1), a fee of seven dollars and fifty cents for each additional license plate so issued up to and including five such plates, and a fee of ten dollars for each license plate so issued in excess of five.

In lieu of registering each vehicle separately:

A dealer in motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers, except dealers in motorcycles, shall pay to the department an annual fee of thirty dollars for the first license plate issued pursuant to section 42-3-116 (1), and a fee of seven dollars and fifty cents for each additional license plate so issued up to and including five, and a fee of ten dollars for each license plate so issued in excess of five; and

A manufacturer of motor vehicles shall pay to the department an annual fee of thirty dollars for the first license plate issued pursuant to section 42-3-116 (1), and a fee of seven dollars and fifty cents for each additional license plate so issued up to and including five, and a fee of ten dollars for each additional license plate issued.

Every drive-away or tow-away transporter shall apply to the department for the issuance of license plates that may be transferred from one vehicle or combination to another vehicle or combination for delivery without further registration. The annual fee payable for the issuance of such plates shall be thirty dollars for the first set and ten dollars for each additional set. No transporter shall permit such license plates to be used upon a vehicle that is not in transit, or upon a work or service vehicle, including a service vehicle utilized regularly to haul vehicles, or by any other person.

Each such transporter shall keep a written record of all vehicles transported, including the description thereof and the names and addresses of the consignors and consignees, and a copy of such record shall be carried in every driven vehicle; except that, when a number of vehicles are being transported in convoy, such copy, listing all the vehicles in the convoy, may be carried in only the lead vehicle in the convoy.

This subsection (7) shall not apply to a nonresident engaged in interstate or foreign commerce if such nonresident is in compliance with the in-transit laws of the state of his or her residence and if such state grants reciprocal exemption to Colorado residents. The department may enter into reciprocal agreements with any other state or states containing such reciprocal exemptions or may issue written declarations as to the existence of any such reciprocal agreements.

Subsections (5), (6)(a), and (7) of this section shall not apply to a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer operated by a dealer or transporter for such dealer's or transporter's private use or to a motor vehicle bearing full-use dealer plates issued pursuant to section 42-3-116 (6)(d).

Paragraph (b) of subsection (6) of this section shall only apply to a motor vehicle if owned and operated by a manufacturer, a representative of a manufacturer, or a person so authorized by the manufacturer. A motor vehicle bearing manufacturer plates shall be of a make and model of the current or a future year and shall have been manufactured by or for the manufacturer to which such plates were issued.

In addition to the registration fees imposed by section 42-3-306 (4)(a), the following additional registration fee shall be imposed on such vehicles:

For farm trucks less than seven years old, twelve dollars;

For farm trucks seven years old but less than ten years old, ten dollars;

For farm trucks ten years old or older, seven dollars.

In addition to the registration fees imposed by section 42-3-306 (5)(a) and (13), for motor vehicles described in section 42-3-306 (5)(a) and (13), the following additional registration fee shall be imposed:

For light trucks and recreational vehicles less than seven years old, twelve dollars;

For light trucks and recreational vehicles seven years old but less than ten years old, ten dollars;

For light trucks and recreational vehicles ten years old or older, seven dollars.

In addition to the registration fees imposed by section 42-3-306 (5)(b), (5)(c), or (12)(b), an additional registration fee of ten dollars shall be assessed.

The department shall adopt rules that allow a vehicle owner or a vehicle owner's agent to apply for apportioned registration for a vehicle that is used in interstate commerce and that qualifies for the registration fees provided in section 42-3-306 (5). In establishing the amount of such apportioned registration, such rules shall take into account the length of time such item may be operated in Colorado or the number of miles such item may be driven in Colorado. The apportioned registration, if based upon the length of time such item may be operated in Colorado, shall be valid for a period of between two and eleven months. Such rules shall also allow for extensions of apportioned registration periods. During such rule-making, the department shall confer with its authorized agents regarding enhanced communications with the authorized agents and the coordination of enforcement efforts.

The additional fees collected pursuant to section 42-3-306 (2)(b)(II) and subsection (9) of this section and paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (10) of this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund to be allocated pursuant to section 43-4-205 (6)(b), C.R.S.

An owner or operator that desires to make an occasional trip into this state with a truck, truck tractor, trailer, or semitrailer that is registered in another state shall obtain a permit from the public utilities commission as provided in article 10.1 of title 40, C.R.S. This subsection (12) does not apply to the vehicles of a public utility that are temporarily in this state to assist in the construction, installation, or restoration of utility facilities used in serving the public.

In addition to the annual registration fees prescribed in this section for vehicles with a seating capacity of more than fourteen and operated for the transportation of passengers for compensation, the owner or operator of every such vehicle operated over the public highways of this state shall pay a passenger-mile tax equal to one mill for each passenger transported for a distance of one mile. The tax shall be credited to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S., as required by section 43-4-203 (1)(c), C.R.S., and allocated and expended as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(d), C.R.S. The tax assessed by this subsection (13) shall not apply to passenger service rendered within the boundaries of a city, city and county, or incorporated town by a company engaged in the mass transportation of persons by buses or trolley coaches.

The owner or operator of special mobile machinery having an empty weight not in excess of sixteen thousand pounds that the owner or operator desires to operate over the public highways of this state shall register such vehicle under section 42-3-306 (5)(a).

The owner or operator of special mobile machinery with an empty weight exceeding sixteen thousand pounds that the owner or operator desires to operate over the public highways of this state shall register the vehicle under section 42-3-306 (5)(b).

The owner of special mobile machinery, except that mentioned in sections 42-1-102 (44) and 42-3-104 (3), that is not registered for operation on the highway shall pay a fee of one dollar and fifty cents, which shall not be subject to any quarterly reduction.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a farmer or rancher from occasionally exchanging transportation with another farmer or rancher when the sole consideration involved is the exchange of personal services and the use of vehicles.

At the time of registration of such vehicle, the owner of a truck subject to registration under section 42-3-306 (5) having a weight in excess of four thousand five hundred pounds, but not in excess of ten thousand pounds, including mounted equipment other than that of a recreational type, shall present to the authorized agent a copy of the manufacturer's statement or certificate of origin that specifies the shipping weight of such vehicle, or if such documentation is not available, a certified scale ticket showing the weight of such vehicle.

The department shall furnish appropriate identification, by means of tags or otherwise, to indicate that a vehicle registered under this section is not subject to clearance by a port of entry weigh station.

In addition to any other fee imposed by this section, the owner shall pay, at the time of registration, a fee of fifty cents on every item of Class A, B, or C personal property required to be registered pursuant to this article. Such fee shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to a special account within the highway users tax fund, to be known as the AIR account, and such moneys shall be used, subject to appropriation by the general assembly, to cover the direct costs of the motor vehicle emissions activities of the department of public health and environment in the presently defined nonattainment area, and to pay for the costs of the commission in performing its duties under section 25-7-106.3, C.R.S. In the program areas within counties affected by this article, the authorized agent shall impose and retain an additional fee of up to seventy cents on every such registration to cover reasonable costs of administration of the emissions compliance aspect of vehicle registration. The department of public health and environment may accept and expend grants, gifts, and moneys from any source for the purpose of implementing its duties and functions under this section or section 25-7-106.3, C.R.S.

In addition to any other fee imposed by this section, at the time of registration of any motor vehicle in the program area subject to inspection and not exempt from registration, the owner shall pay a fee of one dollar and fifty cents. Such fee shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the AIR account within the highway users tax fund, and such moneys shall be expended only to cover the costs of administration and enforcement of the automobile inspection and readjustment program by the department of revenue and the department of public health and environment, upon appropriation by the general assembly. For such purposes, the revenues attributable to one dollar of such fee shall be available for appropriation to the department of revenue, and the revenues attributable to the remaining fifty cents of such fee shall be available for appropriation to the department of public health and environment.

There shall be established two separate subaccounts within the AIR account, one for the revenues available for appropriation to the department of public health and environment pursuant to paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (18) and one for the revenues available for appropriation to the department of revenue pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (18) and section 42-4-305. After the state treasurer transfers moneys in the department of revenue subaccount to the department of revenue equal to the amount appropriated to the department of revenue from the AIR account for the fiscal year, the state treasurer shall transfer from the balance in the department of revenue subaccount to the department of public health and environment subaccount any amount needed to cover appropriations made to the department of public health and environment from the AIR account for that fiscal year for the administration and enforcement of the automobile inspection and readjustment program. Transfers from the department of revenue subaccount to the department of public health and environment subaccount shall be made on a monthly basis after the transfers to the department of revenue equal to the department of revenue's appropriation for that fiscal year have been made. The state treasurer shall not transfer to the department of public health and environment an amount that exceeds the amount of the appropriation made to the department of public health and environment from the AIR account for the fiscal year. Any transfer made pursuant to this paragraph (c) shall be subject to any limits imposed or appropriations made by the general assembly for other purposes and any limitations imposed by section 18 of article X of the state constitution.

Repealed.
(d) (I) (A) Repealed.

In addition to any other fee imposed by this section, the owner, in order to register a motor vehicle or low-power scooter, must pay a motorist insurance identification fee. The department shall annually adjust the fee based upon appropriations made by the general assembly for the operation of the motorist insurance identification database program. The department shall transmit the fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit it to the Colorado DRIVES vehicle services account created in section 42-1-211 (2). This subsection (18)(d)(I)(B) takes effect July 1, 2019.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-274), ch. 210, p. 955, § 8, effective May 1, 2009; (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1268, § 30, effective July 1, 2010.)

The clean screen authority shall transmit moneys from the clean screen fund monthly to the contractor in accordance with the fees determined by section 42-4-311 (6)(a) within one week after receipt by the authority from the department of revenue of a notification of the number of registrations of clean-screened vehicles during the previous month.

Repealed.

If the air quality control commission determines pursuant to section 42-4-306 (23)(b) to implement an expanded clean screen program in the enhanced emissions program area, on and after the specific dates determined by the commission for each of the following subparagraphs:

(I) In addition to any other fee imposed by this section, authorized agents, acting as agents for the clean screen authority, shall collect at the time of registration an emissions inspection fee in an amount determined by section 42-4-311 (6)(a) on every motor vehicle that the department of revenue has determined from data provided by its contractor to have been clean screened; except that the motorist need not pay the emissions inspection fee if the authorized agent determines that a valid certification of emissions compliance has already been issued for the vehicle being registered indicating that the vehicle passed the applicable emissions test at an enhanced inspection center, inspection and readjustment station, motor vehicle dealer test facility, or fleet inspection station.

(II) Authorized agents may retain three and one-third percent of the fee so collected to cover the agent's expenses in the collection and remittance of the fee. County treasurers shall, no later than ten days after the last business day of each month, remit the remainder of the fee to the clean screen authority created in section 42-4-307.5. The clean screen authority shall transmit the fee to the state treasurer, who shall deposit the remainder in the clean screen fund, which fund is hereby created. The clean screen fund is a pass-through trust account to be held in trust solely for the purposes and the beneficiaries specified in this subsection (19). Money in the clean screen fund is not fiscal year spending of the state for purposes of section 20 of article X of the state constitution and is a custodial fund that is not subject to appropriation by the general assembly. Interest earned from the deposit and investment of money in the clean screen fund shall be credited to the clean screen fund, and the clean screen authority may also expend interest earned on the deposit and investment of the clean screen fund to pay for its costs associated with the implementation of House Bill 01-1402, enacted at the first regular session of the sixty-third general assembly. The clean screen authority may also expend interest earned on the deposit and investment of the clean screen fund to pay for its costs associated with the implementation of House Bill 06-1302, enacted at the second regular session of the sixty-fifth general assembly.

In specifying dates for the implementation of the clean screen program pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (19), the commission may specify different dates for the enhanced and basic emissions program areas.

This subsection (19) shall not apply to El Paso county if the commission has excluded such county from the clean screen program pursuant to section 42-4-306 (23)(a).

Any moneys remaining in the clean screen fund upon termination of the AIR program shall revert to the AIR account established in paragraph (a) of subsection (18) of this section.

In addition to any other fee imposed by this section, there shall be collected, at the time of registration, a fee of ten dollars on every light- and heavy-duty diesel-powered motor vehicle in the program area registered pursuant to this article in Colorado. Such fee shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the AIR account in the highway users tax fund, and such moneys shall be used, subject to appropriation by the general assembly, to cover the costs of the diesel-powered motor vehicle emissions control activities of the departments of public health and environment and revenue.

In order to promote an effective emergency medical network and thus the maintenance and supervision of the highways throughout the state, in addition to any other fees imposed by this section, there shall be assessed an additional fee of two dollars at the time of registration of any motor vehicle. Such fee shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the emergency medical services account created by section 25-3.5-603, C.R.S., within the highway users tax fund.

In addition to any other fees imposed by this section, the authorized agent may collect and retain, and an applicant for registration shall pay at the time of registration, a reasonable fee, as determined from time to time by the authorized agent, that approximates the direct and indirect costs incurred, not to exceed five dollars, by the authorized agent in shipping and handling those license plates that the applicant has, pursuant to section 42-3-105 (1)(a), requested that the department mail to the owner.

Repealed.

In addition to any other fee imposed by this section, at the time of registration, the owner shall pay a fee of one dollar on every item of Class A, B, or C personal property required to be registered by this article. Notwithstanding section 43-4-203, the department shall transmit the fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit it to the peace officers standards and training board cash fund, created in section 24-31-303 (2)(b); except that authorized agents may retain five percent of the fee collected to cover the agents' expenses in the collection and remittance of the fee. All of the money in the fund that is collected under this subsection (24) shall be used by the peace officers standards and training board for the purposes specified in section 24-31-310.

In addition to any other fee imposed by this section, each authorized agent shall annually collect a fee of fifty dollars at the time of registration on every plug-in electric motor vehicle. The authorized agent shall transmit the fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit thirty dollars of each fee to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, and twenty dollars of each fee to the electric vehicle grant fund created in section 24-38.5-103.

The department of revenue shall create an electric vehicle decal, which an authorized agent shall give to each person who pays the fee charged under subsection (25)(a) of this section. The decal must be attached to the upper right-hand corner of the front windshield on the motor vehicle for which it was issued. If there is a change of vehicle ownership, the decal is transferable to the new owner.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2005:

(13) and (18)(d)(I) amended, p. 145, § 21, effective April 5; entire article amended with relocations, p. 1136, § 2, effective August 8; (18)(c) amended, p. 328, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

(10)(b) amended, p. 1511, § 71, effective June 1; (1)(c) amended, p. 1011, § 5, effective July 1; (19)(a)(I), (19)(a)(II), and (19)(d) amended and (19)(a)(IV) added, p. 1030, §§ 12, 11, effective July 1; (3)(g) and (3)(h) added, p. 921, § 4, effective January 1, 2007.

L. 2009:

(1)(c) and (18)(d) amended, (SB 09-274), ch. 210, p. 955, § 8, effective May 1; (21) amended, (SB 09-002), ch. 277, p. 1242, § 1, effective May 19; (24) amended, (HB 09-1036), ch. 300, p. 1601, § 1, effective July 1; (4), (5), and (6)(a) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1268, § 29, effective October 1; (18)(d) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1268, § 30, effective July 1, 2010.

L. 2010:

(18)(d)(I) amended, (HB 10-1387), ch. 205, p. 890, § 7, effective May 5; (18)(d)(I) amended, (HB 10-1341), ch. 285, p. 1336, § 1, effective May 26; (2), IP(9), IP(10)(a), (10)(b), (10)(c), (11), (14), and (17)(a) amended and (23) repealed, (SB 10-212), ch. 412, pp. 2036, 2032, § 12, 1, effective July 1; (14) and (15) amended, (HB 10-1172), ch. 320, p. 1491, § 11, effective October 1.

L. 2011:

IP(18)(d)(I) amended, (HB 11-1182), ch. 124, p. 387, § 1, effective April 22; (1)(b)(II) repealed, (HB 11-1004), ch. 136, p. 475, § 2, effective August 10; (12) amended, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 425, § 24, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(18)(d)(I) amended, (HB 12-1216), ch. 80, p. 267, § 6, effective July 1; (19)(a)(I) amended and (19)(a)(IV) repealed, (SB 12-034), ch. 107, p. 362, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

(25) added, (HB 13-1110), ch. 225, p. 1064, § 12, effective January 1, 2014.

L. 2014:

(25)(c)(II) amended, (HB 14-1027), ch. 6, p. 88, § 1, effective February 19; (18)(d)(I) amended, (SB 14-194), ch. 346, p. 1551, § 19, effective June 5; (24) amended, (SB 14-123), ch. 246, p. 946, § 3, effective August 6.

L. 2017:

(18)(d)(I), IP(19)(a), (19)(a)(I), (19)(a)(II), (24), (25)(a), and (25)(b) amended, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, p. 369, § 17, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(18)(d)(I) amended, (SB 18-253), ch. 293, p. 1799, § 3, effective May 29.

L. 2019:

(25)(c) repealed, (HB 19-1298), ch. 384, p. 3438, § 2, effective August 2.

42-3-305. Registration fees - passenger and passenger-mile taxes - fee schedule for years of TABOR surplus revenue - applicability. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2005:

(6), (7), (8)(c), (11)(a), and (11)(b) amended, p. 145, § 21, effective April 5; entire article amended with relocations, p. 1145, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2009:

(2)(a) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1269, § 31, effective October 1.

L. 2010:

Entire section repealed, (SB 10-212), ch. 412, p. 2032, § 1, effective July 1; (12)(a) amended, (HB 10-1172), ch. 320, p. 1492, § 12, effective October 1.